Utah statutes.
78B-14-613.   Jurisdiction to modify child support order of another state when individual parties reside in this state.

(1)  If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this state and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state's child support order in a proceeding to register that order.

(2)  A tribunal of this state exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of Parts 1 and 2, this part, and the procedural and substantive law of this state to the proceeding for enforcement of modification.  Parts 3, 4, 5, 7, and 8 do not apply.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

